lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2553 Y 4
SFX 2553 tis čian . 90
SFX 2553 tis čiuosna . 91
SFX 2553 tis čion . 139
SFX 2553 tis čiosna . 140

SFX 2554 Y 2
SFX 2554 tis čiu . 92
SFX 2554 is i . 141

SFX 2589 Y 1
SFX 2589 is ysis/452 . 155

SFX 2590 Y 1
SFX 2590 is ysis/453 . 155

SFX 2591 Y 1
SFX 2591 is ysis/454 . 155

SFX 2592 Y 40
SFX 2592 ęs ęs . 75
SFX 2592 ęs usis . 118
SFX 2592 ęs usio . 76
SFX 2592 ęs usiam . 79
SFX 2592 ęs usį . 80
SFX 2592 ęs usiu . 81
SFX 2592 ęs usiame . 82
SFX 2592 ęs ęs . 89
SFX 2592 ęs usis . 169
SFX 2592 ęs ę . 77
SFX 2592 ęs usys . 170
SFX 2592 ęs usių . 78
SFX 2592 ęs usiems . 83
SFX 2592 ęs usiem . 84
SFX 2592 ęs usius . 85
SFX 2592 ęs usiais . 86
SFX 2592 ęs usiuose . 87
SFX 2592 ęs usiuos . 88
SFX 2592 ęs ę . 93
SFX 2592 ęs usys . 171
SFX 2592 ęs usi . 121
SFX 2592 ęs us . 172
SFX 2592 ęs usios . 122
SFX 2592 ęs usiai . 125
SFX 2592 ęs usią . 126
SFX 2592 ęs usia . 127
SFX 2592 ęs usioje . 128
SFX 2592 ęs usioj . 129
SFX 2592 ęs usi . 136
SFX 2592 ęs usios . 123
SFX 2592 ęs ę . 123
SFX 2592 ęs usių . 124
SFX 2592 ęs usioms . 130
SFX 2592 ęs usiom . 131
SFX 2592 ęs usias . 132
SFX 2592 ęs usiomis . 133
SFX 2592 ęs usiom . 134
SFX 2592 ęs usiose . 135
SFX 2592 ęs usios . 137
SFX 2592 ęs ę . 137

SFX 2601 Y 4
SFX 2601 ęs usian . 90
SFX 2601 ęs usiuosna . 91
SFX 2601 ęs usion . 139
SFX 2601 ęs usiosna . 140

SFX 2602 Y 2
SFX 2602 ęs usiu . 92
SFX 2602 ęs usi . 141

SFX 2638 Y 5
SFX 2638 ęs usiau . 152
SFX 2638 ęs iau [^djt]ęs 152
SFX 2638 tęs čiau . 152
SFX 2638 ęs iausia [^djt]ęs 153
SFX 2638 tęs čiausia . 153

SFX 2641 Y 1
SFX 2641 ęs ėliau . 154

SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 ęs usysis/452 . 155

SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 ęs usysis/453 . 155

SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 ęs usysis/454 . 155

SFX 2647 Y 1
SFX 2647 ęs esnis/455 . 156

SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 ęs esnis/456 . 156

SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 ęs esnis/457 . 156

SFX 2650 Y 3
SFX 2650 ęs esnysis/452 . 157
SFX 2650 ęs iausiasis/452 [^djt]ęs 158
SFX 2650 tęs čiausiasis/452 . 158

SFX 2651 Y 3
SFX 2651 ęs esnysis/453 . 157
SFX 2651 ęs iausiasis/453 [^djt]ęs 158
SFX 2651 tęs čiausiasis/453 . 158

SFX 2652 Y 3
SFX 2652 ęs esnysis/454 . 157
SFX 2652 ęs iausiasis/454 [^djt]ęs 158
SFX 2652 tęs čiausiasis/454 . 158

SFX 2653 Y 1
SFX 2653 ęs ėlesnis/455 . 159

SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 ęs ėlesnis/456 . 159

SFX 2655 Y 1
SFX 2655 ęs ėlesnis/457 . 159

SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 ęs ėlesnysis/452 . 160

SFX 2657 Y 1
SFX 2657 ęs ėlesnysis/453 . 160

SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 ęs ėlesnysis/454 . 160

SFX 2659 Y 2
SFX 2659 ęs iausias/458 [^djt]ęs 161
SFX 2659 tęs čiausias/458 . 161

SFX 2660 Y 2
SFX 2660 ęs iausias/459 [^djt]ęs 161
SFX 2660 tęs čiausias/459 . 161

SFX 2661 Y 2
SFX 2661 ęs iausias/460 [^djt]ęs 161
SFX 2661 tęs čiausias/460 . 161

SFX 2671 Y 116
SFX 2671 ęs ęs . 75
SFX 2671 ęs iusis [^dt]ęs 118
SFX 2671 ęs iusio [^dt]ęs 76
SFX 2671 ęs iusiam [^dt]ęs 79
SFX 2671 ęs iusį [^dt]ęs 80
SFX 2671 ęs iusiu [^dt]ęs 81
SFX 2671 ęs iusiame [^dt]ęs 82
SFX 2671 ęs ęs [^dt]ęs 89
SFX 2671 ęs iusis [^dt]ęs 169
SFX 2671 ęs ę [^dt]ęs 77
SFX 2671 ęs iusys [^dt]ęs 170
SFX 2671 ęs iusių [^dt]ęs 78
SFX 2671 ęs iusiems [^dt]ęs 83
SFX 2671 ęs iusiem [^dt]ęs 84
SFX 2671 ęs iusius [^dt]ęs 85
SFX 2671 ęs iusiais [^dt]ęs 86
SFX 2671 ęs iusiuose [^dt]ęs 87
SFX 2671 ęs iusiuos [^dt]ęs 88
SFX 2671 ęs ę [^dt]ęs 93
SFX 2671 ęs iusys [^dt]ęs 171
SFX 2671 ęs iusi [^dt]ęs 121
SFX 2671 ęs ius [^dt]ęs 172
SFX 2671 ęs iusios [^dt]ęs 122
SFX 2671 ęs iusiai [^dt]ęs 125
SFX 2671 ęs iusią [^dt]ęs 126
SFX 2671 ęs iusia [^dt]ęs 127
SFX 2671 ęs iusioje [^dt]ęs 128
SFX 2671 ęs iusioj [^dt]ęs 129
SFX 2671 ęs iusi [^dt]ęs 136
SFX 2671 ęs iusios [^dt]ęs 123
SFX 2671 ęs ę [^dt]ęs 123
SFX 2671 ęs iusių [^dt]ęs 124
SFX 2671 ęs iusioms [^dt]ęs 130
SFX 2671 ęs iusiom [^dt]ęs 131
SFX 2671 ęs iusias [^dt]ęs 132
SFX 2671 ęs iusiomis [^dt]ęs 133
SFX 2671 ęs iusiom [^dt]ęs 134
SFX 2671 ęs iusiose [^dt]ęs 135
SFX 2671 ęs iusios [^dt]ęs 137
SFX 2671 ęs ę [^dt]ęs 137
SFX 2671 dęs džiusis . 118
SFX 2671 dęs džiusio . 76
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiam . 79
SFX 2671 dęs džiusį . 80
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiu . 81
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiame . 82
SFX 2671 dęs dęs . 89
SFX 2671 dęs džiusis . 169
SFX 2671 dęs dę . 77
SFX 2671 dęs džiusys . 170
SFX 2671 dęs džiusių . 78
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiems . 83
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiem . 84
SFX 2671 dęs džiusius . 85
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiais . 86
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiuose . 87
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiuos . 88
SFX 2671 dęs dę . 93
SFX 2671 dęs džiusys . 171
SFX 2671 dęs džiusi . 121
SFX 2671 dęs džiusios . 122
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiai . 125
SFX 2671 dęs džiusią . 126
SFX 2671 dęs džiusia . 127
SFX 2671 dęs džiusioje . 128
SFX 2671 dęs džiusioj . 129
SFX 2671 dęs džiusi . 136
SFX 2671 dęs džiusios . 123
SFX 2671 dęs dę . 123
SFX 2671 dęs džiusių . 124
SFX 2671 dęs džiusioms . 130
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiom . 131
SFX 2671 dęs džiusias . 132
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiomis . 133
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiom . 134
SFX 2671 dęs džiusiose . 135
SFX 2671 dęs džiusios . 137
SFX 2671 dęs dę . 137
SFX 2671 tęs čiusis . 118
SFX 2671 tęs čiusio . 76
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiam . 79
SFX 2671 tęs čiusį . 80
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiu . 81
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiame . 82
SFX 2671 tęs tęs . 89
SFX 2671 tęs čiusis . 169
SFX 2671 tęs tę . 77
SFX 2671 tęs čiusys . 170
SFX 2671 tęs čiusių . 78
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiems . 83
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiem . 84
SFX 2671 tęs čiusius . 85
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiais . 86
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiuose . 87
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiuos . 88
SFX 2671 tęs tę . 93
SFX 2671 tęs čiusys . 171
SFX 2671 tęs čiusi . 121
SFX 2671 tęs čiusios . 122
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiai . 125
SFX 2671 tęs čiusią . 126
SFX 2671 tęs čiusia . 127
SFX 2671 tęs čiusioje . 128
SFX 2671 tęs čiusioj . 129
SFX 2671 tęs čiusi . 136
SFX 2671 tęs čiusios . 123
SFX 2671 tęs tę . 123
SFX 2671 tęs čiusių . 124
SFX 2671 tęs čiusioms . 130
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiom . 131
SFX 2671 tęs čiusias . 132
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiomis . 133
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiom . 134
SFX 2671 tęs čiusiose . 135
SFX 2671 tęs čiusios . 137
SFX 2671 tęs tę . 137

SFX 2680 Y 12
SFX 2680 ęs iusian [^dt]ęs 90
SFX 2680 ęs iusiuosna [^dt]ęs 91
SFX 2680 ęs iusion [^dt]ęs 139
SFX 2680 ęs iusiosna [^dt]ęs 140
SFX 2680 dęs džiusian . 90
SFX 2680 dęs džiusiuosna . 91
SFX 2680 dęs džiusion . 139
SFX 2680 dęs džiusiosna . 140
SFX 2680 tęs čiusian . 90
SFX 2680 tęs čiusiuosna . 91
SFX 2680 tęs čiusion . 139
SFX 2680 tęs čiusiosna . 140

SFX 2681 Y 6
SFX 2681 ęs iusiu [^dt]ęs 92
SFX 2681 ęs iusi [^dt]ęs 141
SFX 2681 dęs džiusiu . 92
SFX 2681 dęs džiusi . 141
SFX 2681 tęs čiusiu . 92
SFX 2681 tęs čiusi . 141

SFX 2717 Y 6
SFX 2717 ęs iusiau [^dt]ęs 152
SFX 2717 ęs iusiausia [^dt]ęs 153
SFX 2717 dęs džiusiau . 152
SFX 2717 dęs džiusiausia . 153
SFX 2717 tęs čiusiau . 152
SFX 2717 tęs čiusiausia . 153

SFX 2718 Y 3
SFX 2718 ęs iusėliau [^dt]ęs 154
SFX 2718 dęs džiusėliau . 154
SFX 2718 tęs čiusėliau . 154

SFX 2720 Y 3
SFX 2720 ęs iusysis/452 [^dt]ęs 155
SFX 2720 dęs džiusysis/452 . 155
SFX 2720 tęs čiusysis/452 . 155

SFX 2721 Y 3
SFX 2721 ęs iusysis/453 [^dt]ęs 155
SFX 2721 dęs džiusysis/453 . 155
SFX 2721 tęs čiusysis/453 . 155

SFX 2722 Y 3
SFX 2722 ęs iusysis/454 [^dt]ęs 155
SFX 2722 dęs džiusysis/454 . 155
SFX 2722 tęs čiusysis/454 . 155

SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 asis asis/452 . 155

SFX 2824 Y 1
SFX 2824 asis asis/453 . 155

SFX 2825 Y 1
SFX 2825 asis asis/454 . 155

SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 esnis esnis/455 . 156

SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 esnis esnis/456 . 156

SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 esnis esnis/457 . 156

SFX 2829 Y 5
SFX 2829 esnis esnysis/452 . 157
SFX 2829 esnis iausiasis/452 [^djt]esnis 158
SFX 2829 esnis žiausiasis/452 desnis 158
SFX 2829 esnis ausiasis/452 jesnis 158
SFX 2829 tesnis čiausiasis/452 . 158

SFX 2830 Y 5
SFX 2830 esnis esnysis/453 . 157
SFX 2830 esnis iausiasis/453 [^djt]esnis 158
SFX 2830 esnis žiausiasis/453 desnis 158
SFX 2830 esnis ausiasis/453 jesnis 158
SFX 2830 tesnis čiausiasis/453 . 158

SFX 2831 Y 5
SFX 2831 esnis esnysis/454 . 157
SFX 2831 esnis iausiasis/454 [^djt]esnis 158
SFX 2831 esnis žiausiasis/454 desnis 158
SFX 2831 esnis ausiasis/454 jesnis 158
SFX 2831 tesnis čiausiasis/454 . 158

AF 2823,65521 # 73
AF 2826,2829,2832,2835,2838,65521 # 106
AF 2592,2638,2641,2644,65521 # 241
AF 2823,2824,65521 # 250
AF 2592,2638,2644,65521 # 387
AF 2592,2638,2641,2644,2647,2650,2653,2656,2659,65521 # 403
AF 2826,2827,2829,2830,2832,2833,2835,2836,2838,2839,65521 # 434
