lt-LT_morphology.dic
aiškinamasis/73	8
ankstesnis/106	8
augęs/241	8
baigiamasis/73	8
baudžiamasis/250	8
einamasis/73	8
gydomasis/73	8
kitokesnis/106	8
lyginamasis/73	8
mokamasis/73	8
mokomasis/73	8
nelyginamasis/73	8
nenuklypęs/387	8
nenusipelnęs/387	8
netikęs/241	8
nevedęs/241	8
nevykęs/241	8
nevyresnis/106	8
neviršesnis/106	8
nuklypęs/241	8
nusipelnęs/241	8
nutikęs/241	8
padalomasis/250	8
padūkęs/241	8
pagyvenęs/241	8
parengiamasis/73	8
paruošiamasis/73	8
pasileidęs/241	8
pasiutęs/403	8
paskesnis/106	8
pašėlęs/241	8
patariamasis/73	8
patrakęs/241	8
pažymimasis/73	8
prasikortavęs/241	8
rašomasis/73	8
sakomasis/73	8
siuvamasis/73	8
skiriamasis/73	8
skirstomasis/73	8
sprogstamasis/73	8
steigiamasis/73	8
stojamasis/73	8
suaugęs/403	8
sudedamasis/73	8
sujungiamasis/73	8
sukamasis/73	8
taikomasis/73	8
taupomasis/73	8
tikęs/241	8
tolesnis/434	8
varomasis/73	8
vedęs/241	8
veikiamasis/73	8
vėlesnis/106	8
vykdomasis/250	8
vykęs/241	8
vyresnis/106	8
viršesnis/106	8
